California, session 20252026, AB800.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 5018 is added to the Penal Code, to read:5018. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall do all of the following:(a) Require all food items sold in prison vending machines to be priced at the same average market retail price as in the community in which the prison is located.(b) Take into consideration the research that exists on junk foods and snacks as a cause of obesity in children and families when providing food in the state prison.(c) Encourage the provision of affordable, fresh, and nutritious food items in prison vending machines and the sourcing of food items from local farmers and producers.